src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective   !!= * **@CODE@** is the main lexicon
gilos:gil A_ODD_DD ; !gillus?
rádes:rád A_ODD_ÖÖ ;  !inlagt även alt.form rádásup
tjuorak:tjuora A_ODD_k_K ;
låmmsje:låm A_EVEN_KONTR_D ; 
låmsjes:låm A_EVEN_KONTR_H ; 
mivkes:miv A_EVEN_KONTR_E ; !soft? muvkes?
sjtänntjáj:sjtänntjá A_EVEN_KONTR_C ; !slushy?
